Oklahoma, session 2025, SB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6021.1 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created within Service Oklahoma, the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering Online Licensing Pilot Program.


The program shall focus on developing and improving the application


and fulfillment of licensing of the State Board of Cosmetology and


Barbering. The program will also look to evaluate online


fulfillment of licensing for future professional occupation


licensing.

Req. No. 24 Page 1


B. The State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering shall utilize


the web-based platform described in this act for application and


renewal of professional licenses associated with the State Board of


Cosmetology and Barbering.


C. Service Oklahoma shall select the singular web-based


platform for licensing of professional occupations associated with


the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering in accordance with the


Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act and shall host the platform on its


website.


D. Service Oklahoma and the State Board of Cosmetology and


Barbering shall enter into interagency agreements to implement the


provisions of this section.


E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:


1. Remove, abrogate, reduce, or otherwise affect any power or


duty of the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering to establish or


enforce licensure qualifications, examination requirements, or


disciplinary standards or procedures, or to exercise any other power


or duty of the licensing board provided by law; or


2. Confer to Service Oklahoma any power or duty of the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering provided by law including, but


not limited to, those described in paragraph 1 of this subsection.


The sole function of Service Oklahoma under this act shall be to


select and host the web-based platform as provided by subsection C


of this section.

Req. No. 24 Page 2


F. The executive directors of Service Oklahoma and the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering covered under this section may


promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-24 CAD 12/31/2024 11:57:18 AM



































Req. No. 24 Page 3